Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-312
Contingent compensation contracts; violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation that shall violate any of the provisions of sections 18-310 to 18-312 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1947, c. 49, § 3, p. 169;

Laws 1982, LB 347, § 6.